nb: Ballonglukking/ventiltype: Krever varmeforsegling; Selvforseglende ventil; Knytehals (ingen ventil); Bruker klemme/plugg; Annet
es: Tipo de cierre/válvula de globo: Requiere termosellado; Válvula autosellable; Cuello para anudar (sin válvula); Usa clip/tapón; Otro
en: Balloon closure/valve type: Requires heat sealing; Self-sealing valve; Tie neck (no valve); Uses clip/plug; Other
sl-SI: Tip zapiranja/ventila balona: Potrebno toplotno tesnjenje; Samozapiralni ventil; Zavezovanje vratu (brez ventila); Sponka/čepek; Drugo
nl: Ballon sluiting-/ventieltype: Vereist thermisch afdichten; Zelfsluitend ventiel; Knoophals (geen ventiel); Maakt gebruik van clip/plug; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de fecho/válvula de balão: Requer selagem a quente; Válvula autovedante; Gargalo de atar (sem válvula); Utiliza clipe/tampão; Outro
it: Tipo di chiusura/valvola a palloncino: Richiede termosaldatura; Valvola autosigillante; Collo da annodare (senza valvola); Usa clip/tappo; Altro
ja: バルーン閉鎖／バルブタイプ: 熱圧着が必要; セルフシールバルブ; タイネック (バルブなし); クリップ/プラグ使用; その他
de: Ballonverschluss-/Ventiltyp: Erfordert Heißsiegeln; Selbstschließendes Ventil; Zubindbarer Hals (kein Ventil); Verwendet Clip/Verschluss; Sonstige
fr: Type de fermeture ou de valve du ballon: Nécessite un thermoscellage; Valve auto-obturante; À nouer (sans valve); Utilise un clip/bouchon; Autre
el: Τύπος κλεισίματος/βαλβίδας μπαλονιού: Απαιτείται θερμοκόλληση; Αυτοσφραγιζόμενη βαλβίδα; Με δέσιμο στον λαιμό (χωρίς βαλβίδα); Χρησιμοποιεί κλιπ/πώμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Baliono uždarymo / vožtuvo tipas: Reikia užlydyti; Savaiminio užsidarymo vožtuvas; Užrišamas (be vožtuvo); Naudojamas segtukas / kamštis; Kita
bg-BG: Тип балонно затваряне/клапан: Изисква топлинно запечатване; Самозапечатващ се вентил; Връзване на гърлото (без вентил); Използва щипка/тапа; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta zatvarača/ventila balona: Potrebno toplinsko zavarivanje; Samobrtveni ventil; Zavezani vrat (bez ventila); S kopčom / čepom; Ostalo
zh-CN: 气球封口/气阀类型: 需要热封; 自封气门; 打结封口（无阀门）; 使用夹子/塞子; 其他
sk-SK: Typ uzáveru/ventilu balóna: Vyžaduje tepelné zváranie; Samozatvárací ventil; Uzatváranie na uzol (bez ventilu); Používa sponu/zátku; Iné
fi: Ilmapallon sulku-/venttiilityyppi: Vaatii kuumasaumauksen; Itsestään sulkeutuva venttiili; Solmittava kaula (ei venttiiliä); Käyttää klipsiä/tulppaa; Muu
cs: Typ uzávěru/ventilu nafukovacího balonku: Vyžaduje tepelné zatavení; Samouzavírací ventilek; Zavazovací hrdlo (bez ventilku); Používá klip/zátku; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de fechamento/válvula do balão: Requer selagem a quente; Válvula autovedante; Bico de amarrar (sem válvula); Usa clipe/pino; Outro
pl: Typ zamknięcia/zaworu balonu: Wymaga zgrzewania; Zawór samozamykający; Wiązany ogonek (bez zaworu); Na klips/zatyczkę; Inne
da: Ballonlukning/ventiltype: Kræver varmeforsegling; Selvlukkende ventil; Bindehals (ingen ventil); Bruger klips/prop; Andet
ru: Тип застежки/клапана воздушного шара: Требует запайки; Самозакрывающийся клапан; Завязываемая горловина (без клапана); Используется зажим/заглушка; Другое
sv: Ballongförslutning/ventiltyp: Kräver värmeförsegling; Självförslutande ventil; Knythals (ingen ventil); Använder klämma/plugg; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de închidere/supapă pentru balon: Necesită sigilare termică; Supapă cu autosigilare; Gât care se leagă (fără supapă); Folosește clemă/dop; Altele
vi: Loại van/mở bóng bay: Cần hàn nhiệt; Van tự niêm phong; Buộc cổ (không van); Sử dụng kẹp/nút chặn; Khác
th: ประเภทการปิดผนึก/วาล์วของบอลลูน: ต้องซีลด้วยความร้อน; วาล์วปิดผนึกในตัว; ผูกปาก (ไม่มีวาล์ว); ใช้คลิป/ปลั๊กปิด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 氣球封口/氣門類型: 需熱封; 自封氣門嘴; 綁頸 (無氣門嘴); 使用夾子/塞子; 其他
hu: Léggömb lezárás-/szeleptípusa: Hőhegesztést igényel; Önzáró szelep; Megkötős nyak (szelep nélkül); Csatot/dugót használ; Egyéb
ko: 풍선 밀봉/밸브 유형: 열접착 필요; 자동 밀봉 밸브; 넥 묶음(밸브 없음); 클립/플러그 사용; 기타
tr: Balon kapatma/valf tipi: Isıyla yapıştırma gerektirir; Kendinden sızdırmaz valf; Bağlamalı boyun (valfsiz); Klips/tıpa kullanır; Diğer